Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.149

Diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism—Program for students.

(1) Each institution of higher education must:

(a) Provide a program, either existing or new, on diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism to students beginning with the 2024-25 academic year. Institutions of higher education may expand the focus of its program to reflect the needs of the campus community. This program must be developed in partnership with the institution's administration, faculty, staff, and student leadership groups. Efforts should be made to ensure the program is developed and delivered by individuals with innate and acquired experience and expertise in the field of diversity, equity, and inclusion. The content framework for each program must be posted on each institution's public website for parents and community members; and

(b) Create an evaluation for program participants. The evaluation must, at minimum, capture a participant's level of satisfaction with the program and how they will apply the program to their education.

(2) The purpose of each program must be rooted in eliminating structural racism against all races and promoting diversity, equity, and inclusion while improving outcomes for students from historically marginalized communities. The program must also include elements that focus on commonalities and humanity. Institutions of higher education may further develop a curriculum that is reflective of the needs of the campus community.

(3) During the 2024-25 academic year, all degree-seeking students at institutions of higher education must participate in the program, regardless of whether they are a full-time or part-time student. Beginning with the 2025-26 academic year, the program is only required for degree-seeking students who are new or have transferred to the institution and have not yet participated in a required diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism program at an institution of higher education. Students must be allowed to opt out of participation in the program if they self-attest to taking a diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism training at an institution of higher education within the previous five years.

(4) The state board for community and technical colleges and an organization representing the presidents of the public four-year institutions of higher education may conduct further analysis of the programs, through participant evaluation data, use of focus groups, or other methods to determine promising practices. The state board for community and technical colleges and an organization representing the presidents of the public four-year institutions of higher education must post a list of model standards and promising practices for programs on their public websites for parents and community members.

(5) The institutions of higher education shall adopt rules as necessary or appropriate for effecting the provisions of this section, not in conflict with this chapter, and in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

(6) For purposes of this section, "student" or "students" does not include nonmatriculated students.

[ 2021 c 275 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 275: See notes following RCW 28B.10.145.